Illinois, session 104th, SB3277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-4.13f as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.13f new)7    Sec. 12-4.13f. Families Receiving Emergency Support for 8Hunger (FRESH) Program.9    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section, "SNAP benefits" 10refers to both SNAP benefits provided under Chapter 51 of 11Title VII of the United States Code, and SNAP benefits 12provided under Article XVI of this Code.13    (b) Eligibility. Subject to available funding, the 14Department of Human Services shall establish a Families 15Receiving Emergency Support for Hunger (FRESH) Program to 16provide FRESH benefits to households subject to termination of 17the household's SNAP benefits, or a reduction in the 18household's monthly SNAP benefit allotment, if the termination 19or reduction in SNAP benefits occurred as a result of one or 20more members of the household failing to meet federal SNAP 21work requirements.22    (c) Payment amount.23        (1) For households eligible for FRESH benefits based   SB3277- 2 -LRB104 17409 KTG 30834 b1    on the reduction of SNAP benefits as set forth in 2    subsection (b), FRESH benefits shall be provided as a 3    one-time lump sum payment in an amount equal to 3 times the 4    difference of:5            (A) the amount of the household's monthly SNAP 6        allotment for the month prior to the removal of one or 7        more household members from the SNAP benefit unit, 8        minus9            (B) the reduced amount of the household's monthly 10        SNAP allotment in the month following the removal of 11        one or more household members from the SNAP benefit 12        unit.13        (2) For households eligible for FRESH benefits based 14    on the termination of SNAP benefits as set forth in 15    subsection (b), FRESH benefits shall be provided as a 16    one-time lump sum payment in an amount equal to 3 times the 17    amount of the household's monthly SNAP allotment in the 18    month prior to the termination of SNAP benefits.19    (d) Application.20        (1) To receive FRESH benefits, households must submit 21    an application. The Department of Human Services shall 22    make applications for FRESH benefits available to the 23    public both online and in-person at local Family and 24    Community Resource Centers immediately upon the first of 25    the month following the effective date of this amendatory 26    Act of the 104th General Assembly. The Department shall   SB3277- 3 -LRB104 17409 KTG 30834 b1    utilize all relevant information or electronic data 2    sources available to the Department for purposes of 3    assessing eligibility for FRESH benefits. The Department 4    shall make reasonable efforts to limit the information 5    that must be provided by households in the application for 6    FRESH benefits. An application for FRESH benefits shall 7    not be deemed an application for any other public benefits 8    a person may be eligible for under Section 11-4 of Article 9    XI of this Code.10        (2) Where the reduction or termination of SNAP 11    benefits as set forth in subsection (b) occurred prior to 12    the first of the month following the effective date of 13    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 14    Department shall provide FRESH benefits within 10 calendar 15    days following the household's application for FRESH 16    benefits, if such application is made within 180 days from 17    the date the application for FRESH benefits is made 18    available to the public as set forth in paragraph (1) of 19    this subsection.20        (3) Where the reduction or termination of SNAP 21    benefits as set forth in subsection (b) occurred on or 22    after the first of the month following the effective date 23    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 24    Department shall provide FRESH benefits within 10 calendar 25    days following the household's application for FRESH 26    benefits, if such application is made within 60 days from   SB3277- 4 -LRB104 17409 KTG 30834 b1    the first of the month following the reduction or 2    termination of SNAP benefits.3    (e) FRESH benefits under this Section shall be provided to 4eligible households in the form of cash benefits distributed 5via disbursement to an Electronic Benefits Transfer card.6    (f) Data reporting. The Department shall publish monthly 7data on the number of households who have applied for FRESH 8benefits, the number of households who have been approved for 9FRESH benefits, and the amount of FRESH benefits issued to 10those households. The Department shall further provide this 11data as part of its annual report to the General Assembly. The 12report shall exclude any personally identifiable information.13    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, and 14to the maximum extent permitted by federal law, for purposes 15of determining eligibility and the amount of other assistance 16under this Code, the Department of Human Services and local 17governmental units administering assistance under this Code, 18shall exclude from consideration any FRESH benefits provided 19under this Section.20    (h) Program termination. The provisions of this Section 21are inoperative on and after January 1, 2028. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.